Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.490

Budget stabilization account.

The budget stabilization account shall be established and maintained in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund may be spent only after appropriation.

[ 2007 c 484 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2007 c 484 s 1: "Section 1 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 15, 2007]." [ 2007 c 484 s 9.]